Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
History of title. —

Section 1, ch. 188, Laws 1977, revised this title, substituting §§

1-1-101

to

1-39-102

for §§ 1-1 to 1-1066, W.S. 1957. The original Code of Civil Procedure was enacted as Laws 1886, ch. 60, and consisted of 809 sections. This title, as revised, is based on the original code and many laws which, although not enacted as part of the Civil Code, also relate to civil procedure. For disposition of acts, see the Table of Disposition of Acts. Attention is called to the fact that many provisions of the original Civil Code, and many laws inserted therein in prior compilations, were superseded by the Rules of Civil Procedure, adopted by the supreme court effective December 1, 1957. See Rule 86, W.R.C.P.

Inasmuch as there is no chapter 16 in the 1977 revision of title 1 by § 1, ch. 188, Laws 1977, the chapters following chapter 15 have been renumbered so as to maintain proper numerical sequence and internal references in the statutes have been changed accordingly throughout the title.

Section 2, ch. 188, Laws 1977, reads: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming Legislature during the same session which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict herewith.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

Library References.

Family Law and Practice § 3.02 (Matthew Bender).